Tennessee statutes. Title 61 Partnerships
Part 10

Limited Liability Partnership

61-1-1001. Application process — Registered limited liability partnership.

To become a registered limited liability partnership, a partnership must file with the secretary of state an application stating the name of the partnership; the address of its principal office, and a mailing address such as a post office box if the United States postal service does not deliver to the principal office if the partnership's principal office is not located in this state; the address of a registered office and the name and address of a registered agent for service of process in this state, which the partnership is required to maintain; a brief statement of the business in which the partnership engages; other matters that the partnership determines to include; other information as required by the secretary of state; and that the partnership is applying for status as a registered limited liability partnership.

The application must be executed by one (1) or more partners authorized to execute an application. The registration of a general partnership or limited partnership as a registered limited liability partnership must be approved by a majority of the partners or as otherwise provided in the partnership agreement, or in the case of a limited partnership, by all of the partners, notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in the limited partnership agreement, unless such limited partnership was formed after July 1, 1995, and the original agreement of limited partnership provided for a conversion or a procedure of conversion of the limited partnership to a registered limited liability partnership without the consent of all partners, in which case the approval or procedure under the original limited partnership agreement shall be sufficient.

The application must be accompanied by a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) for each partner on the date of filing, subject to a minimum of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) and a maximum of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

The secretary of state shall register as a registered limited liability partnership any partnership that submits a completed application with the required fee.

A partnership registered under this section shall pay, in each year following the year in which its application is filed, on a date specified by the secretary of state, an annual fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) for each partner on the date of filing, subject to a minimum of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) and a maximum of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500). The fee must be accompanied by a notice, on a form provided by the secretary of state, of any material changes in the information contained in the partnership's application for registration.

A partnership becomes a registered limited liability partnership at the time of the filing of the application, or at a later time as is specified in the application, if there has been substantial compliance with this chapter. Registration remains effective until:

The secretary of state files a written withdrawal statement or other similar document:

Executed and submitted by one (1) or more partners authorized to execute a withdrawal statement, which shall be accompanied by a fee of twenty dollars ($20.00); and

Accompanied by a tax clearance for termination confirmation of good standing by the department of revenue; or withdrawal relative to such registered limited liability partnership; or

Sixty (60) days after the secretary of state mails to the partnership at its last address of record a notice that the partnership has failed to make timely payment of the annual fee specified in subsection (e), unless the fee is paid within the sixty-day period.

The status of a partnership as a registered limited liability partnership and the liability of the partners of the partnership is not affected by:

Errors in the information stated in an application under subsection (a) or a notice under subsection (e); or

Changes after the filing of such an application or notice in the information stated in the application or notice.

The secretary of state may require specific forms and filing methods for documents filed under this chapter.

A partnership that registers as a registered limited liability partnership is not deemed to have dissolved as a result of such registration and is for all purposes the same partnership that existed before the registration and continues to be a partnership under the laws of this state.

If a registered limited liability partnership dissolves and the business of the partnership is continued without winding up or liquidation of the partnership affairs, the partnership that continues the business of the dissolved partnership is a registered limited liability partnership and is not required to file a new application and is deemed to have filed any documents required or permitted under this chapter which were filed by the predecessor partnership.

If a registered limited liability partnership dissolves and the business of the partnership is not continued, then during the wind up or liquidation period the partners of such partnership shall continue to be subject to § 61-1-306(c)-(f).

lf a partnership registers as a registered limited liability partnership, a partner (in the case of a general partnership), or a general partner (in the case of a limited partnership) remains liable for an obligation incurred by the partnership before the partnership registered as a registered limited liability partnership. The partner's liability for obligations and liabilities of the registered limited liability partnership incurred after registration is as provided in § 61-1-306.

The fact that an application or notice is on file in the office of the secretary of state is notice that the partnership is a registered limited liability partnership and is notice of all other facts set forth in the application or notice.

A registered limited liability partnership may amend its registration by filing with the secretary of state a statement of amendment containing the name of the partnership, the address of its principal office or registered office in this state, and the amendment. The statement of amendment shall be accompanied by a fee of twenty dollars ($20.00).

The secretary of state may furnish, upon request and payment of a fee of twenty dollars ($20.00), a certificate of good standing indicating confirmation that a registered limited liability partnership is registered active and in good standing.

Acts 1995, ch. 400, § 9; 1998, ch. 890, § 5; 2001, ch. 353; T.C.A., § 61-1-143; Acts 2009, ch. 354, § 1; 2010, ch. 741, § 49; 2014, ch. 783, § 19; 2017, ch. 440, § 2; 2018, ch. 575, §§ 36-40; 2020, ch. 719, §§ 25, 26.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 1, §§ 61-1-101 — 61-1-148, (Acts 1917, ch. 140, §§ 2 — 43; Shan., §§ 3141b2 — 3141b42 (p. 6585-6595) Shan. Supp., §§ 3118a53 — 3118a93; Acts 1927, ch. 34, §§ 1 — 3; Code 1932, §§ 7841 — 7882; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 7854; Acts 1961, ch. 181, § 1; 1963, ch. 136, § 1; T.C.A.(orig. ed.), §§ 61-101 — 61-142; Acts 1982, ch. 773, § 1; Acts 1995 ch. 400, §§ 1 — 10; 1998, ch. 890, §§ 5, 6; 2000, ch. 568, § 4) was deleted and replaced by Acts 2001, ch. 353 effective January 1, 2002.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment, in (a), substituted “its principal office, and a mailing address such as a post office box if the United States postal service does not deliver to the principal office” for “its principal office”; in (b), inserted “or limited partnership” following “a general partnership” and added the language beginning with “, or in the case of a limited partnership …” to the end; inserted “confirmation of good standing by the department of revenue;” in (f)(1)(B); inserted “(in the case of a general partnership), or a general partner (in the case of a limited partnership)” in (l ); and rewrote (o) which read: “The secretary of state may furnish upon request and payment of a fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) a certificate of good standing indicating that registered limited liability partnership is registered in good standing.”

The 2020 amendment, in (a), substituted a semicolon for a comma following “located in this state”, substituted “partnership is required” for “partnership will be required”, inserted “other information as required by the secretary of state;”, and substituted “partnership is applying for status” for “partnership thereby applies for status”; and in (h), substituted “may require specific” for “may provide”, inserted “and filing methods” and substituted “documents filed” for “an application” and “this chapter.” for “subsection (a) or a notice under subsection (e).”

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 575, § 42. March 16, 2018.

Acts 2020, ch. 719, § 35, June 22, 2020.

61-1-1002. Registered office — Registered agent.

Each registered limited liability partnership, including foreign registered limited liability partnerships, must continuously maintain in this state:

A registered office that may be the same as any of its places of business in this state; and

A registered agent, who may be a partner or any other individual who resides in this state, a domestic corporation, a not-for-profit domestic corporation, a registered limited liability partnership, a limited liability company, or a foreign corporation, not-for-profit foreign corporation, qualified foreign registered limited liability partnership, or limited liability company authorized to transact business in this state. The registered agent must maintain a business office that is identical with the registered office. The registered agent may be designated by title.

If a registered agent resigns or is unable to perform such agent's duties, the registered limited liability partnership shall promptly designate another registered agent to the end that it shall at all times have a registered agent in this state.

A registered limited liability partnership may change its registered office or registered agent by delivering to the secretary of state for filing a statement of change that sets forth:

The name of the registered limited liability partnership;

If the current registered office is to be changed, the street address of the new registered office and the zip code for such office and the county in which the office is located;

If its current registered agent is to be changed, the name or title of its new registered agent; and

That after the change or changes are made, the street addresses of its registered office and the business office of its registered agent will be identical.

If a registered agent changes the street address of such registered agent's business office, such registered agent may change the street address of the registered office of any registered limited liability partnership for which such registered agent is the registered agent by notifying the registered limited liability partnership in writing of the change and signing (either manually or in facsimile) and delivering to the secretary of state for filing a statement that complies with the requirements of subsection (a), and recites that the registered limited liability partnership has been notified of the change.

A registered agent of a registered limited liability partnership may resign such agent's agency appointment by signing and filing with the secretary of state an original statement of resignation accompanied by such agent's certification that such agent has mailed a copy thereof to the principal office of the registered limited liability partnership by certified mail. The statement may include a statement that the registered office is also discontinued.

The agency appointment is terminated, and the registered office discontinued if so provided, on the date on which the statement is filed by the secretary of state.

Acts 1995, ch. 400, § 9; 2001, ch. 353; T.C.A. § 61-1-144.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 1, §§ 61-1-101 — 61-1-148, (Acts 1917, ch. 140, §§ 2-43; Shan., §§ 3141b2 — 3141b42 (p. 6585-6595) Shan. Supp., §§ 3118a53 — 3118a93; Acts 1927, ch. 34, §§ 1 — 3; Code 1932, §§ 7841 — 7882; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 7854; Acts 1961, ch. 181, § 1; 1963, ch. 136, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 61-101 — 61-142; Acts 1982, ch. 773, § 1; Acts 1995 ch. 400, §§ 1 — 10; 1998, ch. 890, §§ 5, 6; 2000, ch. 568, § 4) was deleted and replaced by Acts 2001, ch. 353 effective January 1, 2002.

61-1-1003. Name.

A registered limited liability partnership or foreign registered limited liability partnership name must contain the words “registered limited liability partnership,” or the abbreviation “L.L.P.” or “LLP” or words or abbreviations of like import in another language; provided, that they are written in roman characters or letters; and provided further, that in the case of a foreign registered limited liability partnership, the name may contain, in lieu of the foregoing, the designations allowed by the jurisdiction in which the foreign registered limited liability partnership was registered.

Except as authorized by subsection (c), the name of a domestic limited liability partnership, and the name of a foreign limited liability partnership that is registered in this state or is applying for registration in this state, shall be distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state from the respective names of or for every other entity, whether true, assumed, reserved or registered, to the extent the use or reservation of such names is evidenced by a filing with the secretary of state under applicable law.

A domestic or foreign limited liability partnership, or person acting on behalf of a limited liability partnership not yet registered, may apply to the secretary of state for authorization to use a name that is not distinguishable upon the secretary of state's records from one (1) or more of the names described in subsection (b). The secretary of state shall authorize use of the indistinguishable name applied for, if:

The person holding the right to use the previously filed name described in subsection (b) consents to the use in writing and submits an undertaking, in a form satisfactory to the secretary of state, to cancel its reservation of such name or change such name to a name that is distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state from the name of the applicant;

The applicant delivers to the secretary of state a certified copy of the final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction establishing the applicant's right to use the name applied for in this state;

The person holding the right to use the previously filed name described in subsection (b) consents in writing to the use of such name by the applicant, and both the other person and the applicant consent in a form satisfactory to the secretary of state to use the same registered agent; or

In the case of a registered limited liability partnership or a foreign registered limited liability partnership, the name of the partnership is composed solely of the names of the partners in the partnership.

A person may reserve the exclusive use of a registered limited liability partnership or foreign registered limited liability partnership name, including an assumed name, by delivering an application to the secretary of state for filing. The application must set forth the name and address of the applicant and the name proposed to be reserved. If the secretary of state finds that the registered limited liability partnership name applied for meets the requirements of this section and is available, the secretary of state shall reserve the name for the applicant's exclusive use for a four-month period. Upon the expiration of the four-month period, the same or any other party may apply to reserve the same name.

The owner of a reserved registered limited liability partnership name, including an assumed name, may transfer the reservation to another person by delivering to the secretary of state a notice of the transfer signed by the owner that states the name and address of the transferee.

The reservation of a specific name may be cancelled by filing with the secretary of state a notice, executed by the applicant or transferee, specifying the name reservation to be cancelled and the name and address of the applicant or transferee.

Acts 1995, ch. 400, § 9; 2001, ch. 353; T.C.A., § 61-1-145; Acts 2010, ch. 743, §§ 9, 10.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 1, §§ 61-1-101 — 61-1-148, (Acts 1917, ch. 140, §§ 2 — 43; Shan., §§ 3141b2 — 3141b42 (p. 6585-6595) Shan. Supp., §§ 3118a53 — 3118a93; Acts 1927, ch. 34, §§ 1 — 3; Code 1932, §§ 7841 — 7882; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 7854; Acts 1961, ch. 181, § 1; 1963, ch. 136, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 61-101 — 61 — 142; Acts 1982, ch. 773, § 1; Acts 1995 ch. 400, §§ 1 — 10; 1998, ch. 890, §§ 5, 6; 2000, ch. 568, § 4) was deleted and replaced by Acts 2001, ch. 353 effective January 1, 2002.

61-1-1004. Activities outside the state — Foreign registered limited liability partnership.

A partnership, including a registered limited liability partnership, formed and existing pursuant to an agreement governed by this chapter, may conduct its business, carry on its operations, and have and exercise the powers granted by this chapter in any state, territory, district, or possession of the United States or in any foreign country.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the legal existence of a registered limited liability partnership formed and existing pursuant to an agreement governed by this chapter be recognized outside the boundaries of this state and that the laws of this state governing such registered limited liability partnerships transacting business outside this state be granted the protection of full faith and credit under the Constitution of the United States.

The internal affairs of a partnership, including registered limited liability partnerships, formed and existing pursuant to an agreement governed by this chapter, including the liability of partners for debts, obligations and liabilities of or chargeable to the partnership, shall be subject to and governed by the laws of this state.

Before transacting business in this state, a foreign registered limited liability partnership shall comply with any statutory or administrative registration or filing requirements governing the specific type of business in which the partnership is engaged, and file a notice with the secretary of state, on such forms as the secretary of state shall provide, stating:

The name of the partnership;

The jurisdiction the laws of which govern its partnership agreement and under which it is registered as a registered limited liability partnership;

The address of its principal office (and a mailing address such as a post office box if the United States postal service does not deliver to the principal office);

If the partnership's principal office is not located in this state, the address of an office in this state and the name and address of a registered agent for service of process in this state;

A brief statement of the business in which the partnership engages;

Any other information that the partnership determines to include; and

A statement that the partnership is a registered limited liability partnership. Such notice shall be accompanied by a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) for each partner on the date of filing, subject to a minimum of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) and a maximum of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500). Such notice shall be effective for two (2) years from the date of filing, after which time the partnership shall file a new notice.

It is the policy of this state that the internal affairs of foreign registered limited liability partnerships, and the liability of partners for debts, obligations and liabilities of or chargeable to partnerships, shall be subject to and governed by the laws of such other jurisdiction.

A foreign registered limited liability partnership registered to transact business in this state may withdraw from this state by filing with the office of the secretary of state a statement of withdrawal as a foreign registered limited liability partnership, which shall set forth the information stated in its most recent notice: that the foreign registered limited liability partnership is not transacting business in this state and that it surrenders its registration to transact business in this state; that the foreign registered limited liability partnership revokes the authority of its registered agent in this state to accept service of process and appoints the secretary of state as its agent for service of process in any action, suit, or proceeding based upon any cause of action arising during the time the foreign registered limited liability partnership was registered to transact business in this state; and a mailing address to which the secretary of state may mail a copy of any process served on the secretary of state in the capacity of agent for such registered limited liability partnership.

The statement of withdrawal as a foreign registered limited liability partnership shall be accompanied by a tax clearance for termination or withdrawal relative to such foreign registered limited liability partnership.

A foreign registered limited liability partnership may amend its notice by filing with the secretary of state a statement of amendment containing the name of the partnership, the address of its registered office in this state, and the amendment. The statement of amendment shall be accompanied by a fee of twenty dollars ($20.00).

The secretary of state may furnish upon request and payment of a fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) a certificate of good standing indicating that a foreign registered limited liability partnership has filed a notice pursuant to this section and is in good standing in this state as a foreign registered limited liability partnership.

If the secretary of state determines upon filing of the notice as provided in subsection (d), that a foreign registered limited liability partnership has been transacting business in this state without filing notice for a period of one (1) year or more, then the secretary of state shall also require that the foreign registered limited liability partnership submit a confirmation of good standing relative to such foreign registered limited liability partnership.

Acts 1995, ch. 400, § 9; 1998, ch. 890, § 5; 2001, ch. 353; T.C.A., § 61-1-146; Acts 2010, ch. 741, §§ 50, 51; 2014, ch. 783, § 20.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 1, §§ 61-1-101 — 61-1-148, (Acts 1917, ch. 140, §§ 2 — 43; Shan., §§ 3141b2- 3141b42 (p. 6585-6595) Shan. Supp., §§ 3118a53 — 3118a93; Acts 1927, ch. 34, §§ 1 — 3; Code 1932, §§ 7841 — 7882; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 7854; Acts 1961, ch. 181, § 1; 1963, ch. 136, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 61-101 — 61-142; Acts 1982, ch. 773, § 1; Acts 1995 ch. 400, §§ 1 — 10; 1998, ch. 890, §§ 5, 6; 2000, ch. 568, § 4) was deleted and replaced by Acts 2001, ch. 353 effective January 1, 2002.

61-1-1005. Professional registered limited liability partnerships.

Notwithstanding any other law, a partnership engaged in the rendering of professional services may register as a registered limited liability partnership subject to the laws and regulations governing the provision of professional services by partnerships and such other terms and conditions imposed by its governing professional licensing authority. Nothing in this section shall affect the authority of professional licensing authorities, including the state supreme court, to regulate the practice of the professions.

Acts 1995, ch. 400, § 10; 2001, ch. 353; T.C.A. § 61-1-147.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 1, §§ 61-1-101 — 61-1-148, (Acts 1917, ch. 140, §§ 2 — 43; Shan., §§ 3141b2 — 3141b42 (p. 6585-6595) Shan. Supp., §§ 3118a53 — 3118a93; Acts 1927, ch. 34, §§ 1 — 3; Code 1932, §§ 7841 — 7882; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 7854; Acts 1961, ch. 181, § 1; 1963, ch. 136, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 61-101 — 61-142; Acts 1982, ch. 773, § 1; Acts 1995 ch. 400, §§ 1 — 10; 1998, ch. 890, §§ 5, 6; 2000, ch. 568, § 4) was deleted and replaced by Acts 2001, ch. 353 effective January 1, 2002.

61-1-1006. Certificate of existence.

Any person may apply to the secretary of state to furnish a certificate of existence for a domestic registered limited liability partnership or a certificate of registration for a foreign registered limited liability partnership registered to transact business in this state.

A certificate of existence or registration sets forth:

The domestic registered limited liability partnership's name or the foreign registered limited liability partnership's name used in this state;

That:

The domestic registered limited liability partnership is a limited liability partnership registered under the laws of this state, and the effective date of the filing of its initial application for registration as a registered limited liability partnership; or

The foreign registered limited liability partnership is a limited liability partnership registered to transact business in this state;

That all fees, taxes and penalties owed to this state have been paid, if:

Payment is reflected in the records of the secretary of state or the department of revenue; and

Nonpayment affects the registration of the domestic or foreign registered limited liability partnership;

Whether or not the registration of a domestic or foreign registered limited liability partnership as such remains effective;

That the certificate of existence or registration is effective as of the date of the issuance of the certificate; and

Other facts of record in the office of the secretary of state that may be requested by the applicant.

Subject to any qualifications stated in the certificate, a certificate of existence or registration issued by the secretary of state may be relied upon as conclusive evidence that the domestic or foreign registered limited liability partnership is registered as a domestic registered limited liability partnership or is registered to transact business in this state as a foreign registered limited liability partnership and is in good standing as far as the records of the secretary of state show.

Acts 2010, ch. 742, § 10.